src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ============================= !
!! !!!File containing abbreviations 
! ============================= !

!! !!Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 4 + 1  groups, because of the preprocessor
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation   !!= * __@CODE@__
ITRAB ;	   !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (intransitive abbrs) Ltd.
TRNUMAB ;  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numerals)
TRAB ;	   !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (transitive abbrs) tri. 
!NOAB ;	   !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (not really abbrs)
!NUMNOAB ;  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (not behaving as abbr before num)
SYMBOLS ;  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (misc. symbols)

!! !!The sublexica

!! !Dividing between abbreviations with and witout final period

!! ABBREVIATIONS 
!! these still need development 2015-09-11
!LEXICON AB-DOT_
!+WORK+ABBR:%.%> # ;

LEXICON AB-DOT-A_
+A+ABBR:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-ADV_
+Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-N_
+N+ABBR:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-NUM_
+Num+ABBR:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-PRON_
+Pron+ABBR:%.%> # ;
!LEXICON AB-DOT-V_
!+V+ABBR:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-V-TV-IMPRT-SG2_
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt+Sg2:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-V-TV-IND-PRS-3_
+V+ABBR+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%.%> # ;
+V+ABBR+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%.%> # ;
LEXICON AB-DOT-V-IV-IND-PRT-SG3_
+V+ABBR+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%.%> # ;

!LEXICON AB-NO-DOT_
!+WORK+ABBR:%> # ;
!LEXICON AB-NO-DOT-A_
!+A+ABBR:%> # ;
!LEXICON AB-NO-DOT-ADV_
!+Adv+ABBR:%> # ;
LEXICON AB-NO-DOT-N_
+N+ABBR:%> # ;
!LEXICON AB-NO-DOT-PRON_
!+Pron+ABBR:%> # ;
!LEXICON AB-NO-DOT-V_
!+V+ABBR:%> # ;

!LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+V+ABBR+IV+PrfPrc:%.%> # ; ! Period.

!!
!LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
!ab-dot-noun ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

!! !The lexicons that add tags



LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__  The bulk
       +N+ABBR+Attr:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Nom:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Acc:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Gen:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:i   # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Loc:%>%:st   # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Com:%>%:in  # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n   # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill+Err/Orth:%>%:ii  # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Loc+Err/Orth:%>%:as  # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%>%:ain # ;! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%>%:iin # ;! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Ess+Err/Orth:%>%:an  # ; ! no period, that is. !
!+N+ABBR: RHyph ;

!LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
!!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+A+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+A+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!!+A+ABBR: RHyph ;

!LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
! +Adv+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!! +Adv+ABBR: RHyph ;

!LEXICON ab-nodot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
!!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+Num+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!+Num+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
!!+Num+ABBR: RHyph ;


LEXICON ab-dot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
       +N+ABBR+Attr:%.%>      # ;
        +N+ABBR+Nom:%.%>      # ;
        +N+ABBR+Acc:%.%>      # ;
        +N+ABBR+Gen:%.%>      # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Ill:%.%>%:i   # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Loc:%.%>%:s   # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Com:%.%>%:in  # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Ess:%.%>%:n   # ;
!+N+ABBR+Ill+Err/Orth:%.%>%:ii  # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Loc+Err/Orth:%.%>%:as  # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%.%>%:ain # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%.%>%:iin # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Ess+Err/Orth:%.%>%:an  # ; !
!+N+ABBR:%. RHyph ;


!LEXICON ab-dot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
!+A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
!+A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
!+A+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ;
!+A+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

!LEXICON ab-dot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
!+Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ; ! Adv without case.

!LEXICON ab-dot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
!! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
!+Num+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
!+Num+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ;
!+Num+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

!LEXICON ab-dot-cc   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+CC+ABBR:%.%> # ;


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__  A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
!ab-dot-verb ;
!ab-nodot-verb ;
!ab-dot-IVprfprc ;

!LEXICON ab-dot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%> # ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%> # ; ! No period.
! # ;



LEXICON SYMBOLconnector   !!= * __@CODE@__
  +Attr+Use/Circ:   K ; ! §
  +Sg+Nom+Use/Circ:   K ; ! §
!          +Sg+Gen:   K ; ! §
!          +Sg+Acc:   K ; ! §
 +Err/Orth+Use/Circ:   SYMBOLsuff ; ! §as
         +Use/Circ:%: SYMBOLsuff ; ! §:s
 +Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%- SYMBOLsuff ; ! §-as ! Perhaps.
 +Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%' SYMBOLsuff ; ! §'as ! Perhaps.

LEXICON SYMBOLsuff   !!= * __@CODE@__
!                       K ; ! § 14 (no case on the bare §). Oh, yes. Case.
         +Sg+Gen:       K ;	! §    (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
         +Sg+Acc:       K ;	!       suffix)
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a      K ;	! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:a      K ;	!       suffix)
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij     K ;
         +Sg+Ill:i      K ;
         +Sg+Loc:s      K ;  ! §:s
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as     K ;  ! §:as
         +Sg+Com:in     K ;
            +Ess:n      K ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:an     K ;
         +Pl+Nom:t      K ;
         +Pl+Gen:id     K ;
         +Pl+Acc:id     K ;
         +Pl+Ill:ide    K ;
         +Pl+Loc:in     K ;
         +Pl+Com:igujn  K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:at     K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ajd    K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ajd    K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ajde   K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ajn    K ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ajgujn K ;



!! !!The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! Miscellaneous symbols, abbreviation symbols
! -------------------------------------------

LEXICON TRAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains preposed transitive abbreviations 
A+Use/SpellNoSugg:A AB-DOT-N_;
B+Use/SpellNoSugg:B AB-DOT-N_;
C+Use/SpellNoSugg:C AB-DOT-N_;
D+Use/SpellNoSugg:D AB-DOT-N_;
E+Use/SpellNoSugg:E AB-DOT-N_;
F+Use/SpellNoSugg:F AB-DOT-N_;
G+Use/SpellNoSugg:G AB-DOT-N_;
H+Use/SpellNoSugg:H AB-DOT-N_;
I+Use/SpellNoSugg:I AB-DOT-N_;
J+Use/SpellNoSugg:J AB-DOT-N_;
K+Use/SpellNoSugg:K AB-DOT-N_;
L+Use/SpellNoSugg:L AB-DOT-N_;
M+Use/SpellNoSugg:M AB-DOT-N_;
N+Use/SpellNoSugg:N AB-DOT-N_;
O+Use/SpellNoSugg:O AB-DOT-N_;
P+Use/SpellNoSugg:P AB-DOT-N_;
Q+Use/SpellNoSugg:Q AB-DOT-N_;
R+Use/SpellNoSugg:R AB-DOT-N_;
S+Use/SpellNoSugg:S AB-DOT-N_;
T+Use/SpellNoSugg:T AB-DOT-N_;
U+Use/SpellNoSugg:U AB-DOT-N_;
V+Use/SpellNoSugg:V AB-DOT-N_;
W+Use/SpellNoSugg:W AB-DOT-N_;
X+Use/SpellNoSugg:X AB-DOT-N_;
Y+Use/SpellNoSugg:Y AB-DOT-N_;
Z+Use/SpellNoSugg:Z AB-DOT-N_;
Æ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Æ AB-DOT-N_;
Ø+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ø AB-DOT-N_;
Å+Use/SpellNoSugg:Å AB-DOT-N_;
Ä+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ä AB-DOT-N_;
Ö+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ö AB-DOT-N_;
Č+Use/SpellNoSugg:Č AB-DOT-N_;
Š+Use/SpellNoSugg:Š AB-DOT-N_;
Ž+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ž AB-DOT-N_;
Ŧ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ŧ AB-DOT-N_;
Đ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Đ AB-DOT-N_;
Ŋ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ŋ AB-DOT-N_;
Á+Use/SpellNoSugg:Á AB-DOT-N_;
Ǩ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ǩ AB-DOT-N_;
Ǧ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ǧ AB-DOT-N_;
Ǥ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ǥ AB-DOT-N_;
Ʒ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ʒ AB-DOT-N_;
Ǯ+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ǯ AB-DOT-N_;
ž+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ž AB-NO-DOT-N_;
á+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:á AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ŋ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ŋ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
đ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:đ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ŧ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ŧ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
a+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:a AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
c+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:c AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
d+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:d AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
e+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:e AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
f+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:f AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
g+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:g AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
h+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:h AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
i+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:i AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
j+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:j AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
k+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:k AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
l+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:l AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
m+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:m AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
n+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:n AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
o+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:o AB-NO-DOT-N_; !mysko
p+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:p AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
q+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:q AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
r+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:r AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
s+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:s AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
t+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:t AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
u+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:u AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
v+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:v AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
w+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:w AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
x+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:x AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
y+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:y AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
z+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:z AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
æ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:æ AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
ø+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ø AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
å+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:å AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
ä+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ä AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
ö+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ö AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
č+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:č AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
š+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:š AB-NO-DOT-N_; !
ǩ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ǩ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ǧ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ǧ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ǥ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ǥ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ʒ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ʒ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ǯ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ǯ AB-NO-DOT-N_;
ž+Use/SpellNoSugg:ž AB-DOT-N_;
á+Use/SpellNoSugg:á AB-DOT-N_;
ŋ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ŋ AB-DOT-N_;
đ+Use/SpellNoSugg:đ AB-DOT-N_;
ŧ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ŧ AB-DOT-N_;
a+Use/SpellNoSugg:a AB-DOT-N_; !
c+Use/SpellNoSugg:c AB-DOT-N_; !
d+Use/SpellNoSugg:d AB-DOT-N_; !
e+Use/SpellNoSugg:e AB-DOT-N_; !
f+Use/SpellNoSugg:f AB-DOT-N_; !
g+Use/SpellNoSugg:g AB-DOT-N_; !
h+Use/SpellNoSugg:h AB-DOT-N_; !
i+Use/SpellNoSugg:i AB-DOT-N_; !
j+Use/SpellNoSugg:j AB-DOT-N_; !
k+Use/SpellNoSugg:k AB-DOT-N_; !
l+Use/SpellNoSugg:l AB-DOT-N_; !
m+Use/SpellNoSugg:m AB-DOT-N_; !
n+Use/SpellNoSugg:n AB-DOT-N_; !
o+Use/SpellNoSugg:o AB-DOT-N_; !
p+Use/SpellNoSugg:p AB-DOT-N_; !
q+Use/SpellNoSugg:q AB-DOT-N_; !
r+Use/SpellNoSugg:r AB-DOT-N_; !
s+Use/SpellNoSugg:s AB-DOT-N_; !
t+Use/SpellNoSugg:t AB-DOT-N_; !
u+Use/SpellNoSugg:u AB-DOT-N_; !
v+Use/SpellNoSugg:v AB-DOT-N_; !
w+Use/SpellNoSugg:w AB-DOT-N_; !
x+Use/SpellNoSugg:x AB-DOT-N_; !
y+Use/SpellNoSugg:y AB-DOT-N_; !
z+Use/SpellNoSugg:z AB-DOT-N_; !
æ+Use/SpellNoSugg:æ AB-DOT-N_; !
ø+Use/SpellNoSugg:ø AB-DOT-N_; !
å+Use/SpellNoSugg:å AB-DOT-N_; !
ä+Use/SpellNoSugg:ä AB-DOT-N_; !
ö+Use/SpellNoSugg:ö AB-DOT-N_; !
č+Use/SpellNoSugg:č AB-DOT-N_; !
š+Use/SpellNoSugg:š AB-DOT-N_; !
ǩ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ǩ AB-DOT-N_;
ǧ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ǧ AB-DOT-N_;
ǥ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ǥ AB-DOT-N_;
ʒ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ʒ AB-DOT-N_;
ǯ+Use/SpellNoSugg:ǯ AB-DOT-N_;
